Illinois, session 104th, HB3367.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by adding Article 113A as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/Art. 113A heading new)7ARTICLE 113A. SPECIAL ADVOCATES 8    (725 ILCS 5/113A-1 new)9    Sec. 113A-1. Special advocates.10    (a) In a prosecution of a criminal case involving the 11injury, health, or safety of a cat or dog, the court may, on 12its own motion or motion of any party, appoint a licensed 13attorney-at-law of this State or a law student authorized to 14provide services under Supreme Court Rule 711 as a special 15advocate to assist the court, as deemed appropriate by the 16court, and represent the interests of justice regarding the 17health or safety of the cat or dog.18    (b) The advocate may: 19        (1) monitor the case; 20        (2) consult any person with information that could aid 21    the court and review records relating to the condition of 22    the cat or dog and the defendant's actions, including, but   HB3367- 2 -LRB104 10137 RLC 20209 b1    not limited to, records from animal control officers, 2    veterinarians, and police officers; 3        (3) attend hearings; and 4        (4) present information or recommendations to the 5    court pertinent to determinations that relate to the 6    interests of justice, provided that information shall be 7    based solely on the duties undertaken under this 8    subsection (b). 9    (c) Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10Assembly shall be construed to alter the legal status of 11animals as a unique class of personal property.